Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 12.
TEXTILE MILLS, TAX EXEMPTION.

Cotton mills tax exempt for seven years.

All capital invested in a textile mill in this state for the manufacture of cotton and fiber goods in any manner shall be and is hereby declared to be exempt from taxation for a period of seven years from the date of the location of said textile mill.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by the General Assembly at the 1925 regular session (see Acts 1925, p. 1089) and adopted at the general election on Oct. 5, 1926, by a vote of 102,044 for and 31, 661 against.

Effective Dates.

Ark. Const. Amend. 12, § 2: effective after approval and adoption by the people of the State of Arkansas.